Utah statutes.
51-7a-202.   State treasurer to follow "prudent investor" rule -- Standard
of care.
(1)  The state treasurer shall invest and manage the trust fund assets as a
prudent investor would, by:
(a)  considering the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other
circumstances of the trust funds; and
(b)  exercising reasonable care, skill, and caution in order to meet the
standard of care of a prudent investor.
(2)  In determining whether or not the state treasurer has met the standard of
care of a prudent investor, the judge or finder of fact shall:
(a)  consider the state treasurer's actions in light of the facts and
circumstances existing at the time of the investment decision or action, and
not by hindsight; and
(b)  evaluate the state treasurer's investment and management decisions
respecting individual assets:
(i)  not in isolation, but in the context of a trust fund portfolio as a
whole; and
(ii)  as a part of an overall investment strategy that has risk and return
objectives reasonably suited to the trust funds.
